Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9B-105] Duties of insurers utilizing
the services of a reinsurance intermediary-broker. (a) An insurer shall
not engage the services of any person, firm, association, or corporation to act
as a reinsurance intermediary-broker on its behalf unless the person, firm,
association, or corporation is licensed as required by section 431:9B-102.

(b) An insurer may not employ an individual
who is employed by a reinsurance intermediary-broker with which it transacts
business, unless the reinsurance intermediary-broker is under common control
with the insurer and subject to article 11.

(c) The insurer shall annually obtain a copy
of statements of the financial condition of each reinsurance
intermediary-broker with which it transacts business. [L 1992, c 176, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next